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−DIAGNOSTICS ABS&VEHICLESTABILITYCONTROL(VSC)&
BRAKE ASSIST (BA) SYSTEM

DI−77

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM731E)

DTC C 1244 / 44 Deceleration Sensor Circuit

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
This sensor detects deceleration on the vehicle. The sensor signal is used in ABS & BA & TRC & VSC con-
trol. If the sensor functions abnormally, the ABS warning light comes on.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1244 / 44

Either of the following 1., 2., 3. or 4. is detected:
1. The condition that ECU terminals GL1 and GL2 values are

−1.5Gor lessor1.5Gormorecontinues for1.2sec.or
more.

2. The condition that the deceleration sensor terminal VGS
voltage is 4.4 V or less or 5.6 V or more continues for 1.2
sec. or more.

3.At thevehiclespeedof0km/h (0mph),after thedifference
of output value between deceleration sensor terminals GL1
and GL2 becomes 0.6 G or more, and the condition that
does not become 0.4 G or less continues for 60 sec. or
more.

4. Deceleration sensor signal momentary open occurs for 7
times or more.

SDecelerationsensor
SDecelerationsensorcircuit

Fail safe function:
If trouble occurs in the deceleration sensor circuit, the ECU cuts off current to the ABS solenoid relay and
prohibits ABS & BA & TRC & VSC controls and the brake system becomes normal.

WIRING DIAGRAM
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check for open and short circuit in harness and connector between deceleration
sensor and ABS & BA & TRC & VSC ECU (See page IN−35).

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

2 Check deceleration sensor (See page DI−4) .

NG Replace deceleration sensor.

OK

Check and replace ABS & BA & TRC & VSC
ECU.


